District of Columbia statutes.
24-231.03

Use of Fund revenues.

Receipts from the sales of goods and services produced by the prison industries program shall be deposited to the credit of the Fund. The Fund shall be used for all necessary expenses directly related to the Fund, including personal services; payments to inmates, or payments to their dependents in accordance with this subchapter; purchase, repair, and maintenance of equipment; purchase of raw materials and supplies; payment of dues and expenses of attendance at meetings and conventions, as approved by the Mayor; maintenance and repair of buildings used for Fund purposes; alteration of existing facilities used for Fund purposes; and, within the limits of amounts provided in annual appropriation acts, acquisition and improvement of real property.

May 8, 1996, D.C. Law 11-117, § 4, 43 DCR 1179
1981 Ed., § 24-458.3.